engguesser.foma
# Our lexicon

def C [b|c|d|f|g|h|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z];
def V [a|e|i|o|u|y];

def Word [C|V]+;

# Substitute all transitions with "[GUESSNOUN]" in-place
# with Word before defining the lexicon

read lexc engguesser.lexc
define Lex

def Ins [..] -> "[GUESS]" || "[GUESSNOUN]" ?* _ .#.;
def Lex [Lex.i .o. Ins].i;

regex Lex;
substitute defined Word for "[GUESSNOUN]"
def Lex

# Define sibilants orthographically
def Sib [s | s h | z | x | c h ];

# e-epenthesis rule: bus+s > buses, etc.
def ERule "+" -> e || Sib _ Sib ;
def YRule y -> i e || C _ "+" ;
def Cleanup "+" -> 0 ;

def Grammar Lex .o. ERule .o. YRule .o. Cleanup ;

def GuessGr $["[GUESS]"] .o. Grammar;
def RealGr ~$["[GUESS]"] .o. Grammar;
def Filter ~[RealGr.l];

regex [GuessGr .o. Filter] | RealGr;
